Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3317
Veterinary medicine and surgery, defined.

Veterinary medicine and surgery includes veterinary surgery, obstetrics, dentistry, and all other branches or specialties of veterinary medicine.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1099.

Under prior law, given its ordinary meaning, dentistry, as used in section 71-1,154(2), includes procedures performed in an animal's mouth. State ex rel. Dept. of Health v. Jeffrey, 247 Neb. 100, 525 N.W.2d 193 (1994).